data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX Y Y 151
SFX Y   r               va              ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   r               vas             ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   ar              ávamos          ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ar              ávamo-nos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ar              áveis           ar              +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   r               vam             ar              +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ar              ei              [^cçg]ar        +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   car             quei            car             +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   gar             guei            gar             +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   çar             cei             çar             +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               ste             ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               mos             ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               mo-nos          ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   ar              ou              ar              +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   ar              ámos            ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   ar              ámo-nos         ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   r               stes            ar              +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               am              ar              +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               a               ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               as              ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   ar              áramos          ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   ar              áramo-nos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   ar              áreis           ar              +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               am              ar              +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               ei              ar              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               ás              ar              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               á               ar              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               emos            ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               emo-nos         ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               eis             ar              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               ão              ar              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   r               sse             ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   r               sses            ar              +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   ar              ássemos         ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   ar              ássemo-nos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   ar              ásseis          ar              +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   r               ssem            ar              +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   0               es              ar              +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX Y   0               mos             ar              +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               des             ar              +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               em              ar              +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               ia              ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               ias             ar              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               íamos           ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               -nos-íamos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               íeis            ar              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               iam             ar              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   r               ndo             ar              +T=g
SFX Y   r               do              ar              +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               da              ar              +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               dos             ar              +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               das             ar              +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   er              ia              er              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   er              ias             er              +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   er              íamos           er              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   er              íamo-nos        er              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   er              íeis            er              +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   er              iam             er              +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   er              i               er              +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               ste             er              +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               u               er              +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               mos             er              +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   r               mo-nos          er              +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   r               stes            er              +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               am              er              +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               a               er              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               as              er              +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   er              êramos          er              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   er              êramo-nos       er              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   er              êreis           er              +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               am              er              +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               ei              er              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               ás              er              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               á               er              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               emos            er              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               -nos-emos       er              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               eis             er              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               ão              er              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   r               sse             er              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   r               sses            er              +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   er              êssemos         er              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   er              êssemo-nos      er              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   er              êsseis          er              +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   r               ssem            er              +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   0               es              er              +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX Y   0               mos             er              +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               mo-lo           er              +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               des             er              +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               em              er              +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               ia              er              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               ias             er              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               íamos           er              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               -nos-íamos      er              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               íeis            er              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               iam             er              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   r               ndo             er              +T=g
SFX Y   er              ido             er              +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   er              ida             er              +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   er              idos            er              +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   er              idas            er              +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   ever            ito             crever          +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   ever            ita             crever          +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   ever            itos            crever          +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   ever            itas            crever          +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               a               ir              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   r               as              ir              +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX Y   ir              íamos           ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ir              íamo-nos        ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ir              íeis            ir              +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   r               am              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX Y   ir              i               ir              +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               ste             ir              +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX Y   r               u               ir              +P=3,N=s,T=pp
