data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abaular/YPLM
abolir/YPLcMD
aburguesar/XYPL
acasalar/XYPLcM
achinelar/XYPL
acoitar/XYPLMD
acoronhar/XYPL
açudar/XYPL
adestrar/XYPLMD
adoecer/XYPLM
adversar/XYPL
afifar/XYPLcD
afoitar/XYPL
afronhar/XYPL
aglutinar/XYPLcMDnv
aguarelar/XYPL
ajudar/XYPLn
alcalinizar/XYPL
alertar/XYPL
alhear/XY
alombar/XYPL
aluviar/XYPL
amalucar/XYPL
amar/XYPLDnB
amiudar/YPL
amordaçar/XYPL
amuar/XYPLM
anelar/XYPL
anodizar/XYPLcMD
antepassar/XYL
apalermar/XYL
aparvalhar/XYPL
apequenar/XYPL
aplainar/XYPLcMD
apostolar/XYPL
aprestar/XYPLcMD
aquartilhar/XYPL
arfar/XYLn
arquitetar/XYPLc
arredar/XYPLM
arrepender/XYLMB
arroxear/ZYPL
asfixiar/XYPLnM
assenhorar/XYLM
assoar/XYPL
assustar/XYPLD
ataviar/XYPLM
atinar/XYPL
atoxicar/XYPL
atulhar/XYPLM
automatizar/XYPLc
aventar/XYPL
aviventar/XYPLD
bacharelar/XYPL
balburdiar/XYPL
banquetear/ZYPLD
basificar/XYPLc
beliscar/XYPL
bicar/XYPL
bisnagar/XYPL
bolhar/XYPLn
bostar/XYPL
brilhar/XYLn
burlar/XYPLD
cacicar/XYL
caldear/ZYPLcM
camuflar/XYPL
capear/ZYPLM
carbonizar/XYPLcDv
cartografar/XYPL
catalisar/XYPLD
cavacar/XYPL
centrar/XYPLS
chalacear/ZYLD
chegar/XYPLMDn
choramingar/XYLD
cimentar/XYPLc
circunvolver/XYPL
climatizar/XYPLc
cobrir/YPLRMD
colaborar/XYLcDn
combalir/XYPL
compaginar/XYPLc
compostar/XY
conceptualizar/XYPLc
condutar/XYPL
confraternizar/XYLc
consciencializar/XYPLc
constelar/XYPLc
contextuar/XYPLc
contramanobrar/XYL
controlar/XYPLSDvB
coparticipar/XYPLn
correger/XYPLMD
costumar/XYPL
crer/YLSDn
crucificar/XYPLcD
custear/ZYPLM
debruar/XYPL
decotar/XYPLD
defrontar/XYLcn
delimitar/XYPLcD
denominar/XYPLcD
depredar/XYPLDc
desadensar/XYPL
desanimar/XYPLcD
desassorear/ZYPLM
desbandar/XYPL
descarnar/XYPLD
descomprimir/XYPL
descortiçar/XYPL
desembrenhar/XYPL
desencrencar/XYPL
desenjaular/XYPL
desentrincheirar/XYPL
desfeitear/ZYPLD
desgarrar/XYPL
desinquietar/XYPLcDn
desmazelar/XYPLB
desobrigar/XYPLc
despenhar/XYPLM
despontuar/XYPL
dessecar/XYPLcDn
desunir/XYPLv
detetar/XYPLv
diferir/ZYPLM
diplomar/XYPL
dissecar/XYPLcDn
divergir/YL
domiciliar/XYPLc
durar/XYLcv
elaborar/XYPLRcDv
emaranhar/XYPLS
embasbacar/XYPLcM
emborcar/XYPLc
emendar/XYPLDv
empapar/XYPL
empinar/XYPL
emudecer/XYPLM
encalmar/XYPL
encarapinhar/XYPL
encatrafiar/XYPL
encimar/XYPL
encorpar/XYPLM
endereçar/XYPLM
enfarinhar/XYPLM
enfolhar/XYPLM
engasgar/XYPLM
engrenar/XYPL
enobrecer/XYPLM
enrolhar/XYPLS
ensinar/XYPLRMDv
enterrar/XYPLcMD
entrelinhar/XYPLM
enunciar/XYPLcDv
enxaropar/XYPL
erguer/XYPLR
esborratar/XYPL
escangalhar/XYPL
escolarizar/XYPLnc
escudar/XYPL
esforricar/XYPL
esmaltar/XYPLD
esparrinhar/XYPLM
espicaçar/XYPL
espumar/XYPLn
estagnar/XYPLcMDn
estigmatizar/XYPL
estragar/XYPLcMD
estucar/XYPLD
europeizar/YPLc
excetuar/XYPL
exonerar/XYPLc
explorar/XYPLcDv
extraviar/XYPLD
faiscar/XYLcDn
fanfar/XYL
faxinar/XYPL
ferver/XYLRDn
findar/XYPLDv
flexionar/XYPL
formalizar/XYPLc
fotografar/XYPL
friccionar/XYPLD
furtar/XYPL
gananciar/XYPL
gatafunhar/XYL
germinar/XYPLcDn
gondolar/XYL
gramar/XYPLD
grudar/XYPLDS
habituar/XYPLSc
honrar/XYPLS
imortalizar/XYPLcDv
imutar/XYPLcv
indemnizar/XYPLcDv
infestar/XYPLcDnS
insonorizar/XYPLc
interligar/XYPLScMn
inveterar/XYPLc
juntar/XYPL
lançar/XYPLMDvR
lentejoular/XYPL
locomover/XYL
magoar/XYPL
manquitar/XYL
masculinizar/XYPL
melhorar/XYPLMD
metralhar/XYPLD
mnemonizar/XYPLcv
morrer/XYL
namoriscar/XYPL
nodular/XYL
ocidentalizar/XYPLc
opulentar/XYPL
ozonar/XYPL
pantominar/XYL
pasmar/XYPL
pelar/XYPLD
perfilhar/XYPLcMDn
pessoalizar/XYPLnc
planificar/XYPLcv
portear/ZYPL
predicar/XYPLcDv
presidiar/XYPL
professar/XYPLn
prostrar/XYPLcM
qualificar/XYPLcDvRE
radicar/XYPLcn
ratear/ZYPLcMD
rebeijar/XYPL
recingir/XYPL
recuperar/XYPLcDv
refletir/YLD
registar/XYPLcDv
religar/XYPL
rendilhar/XYPLM
republicar/XYPLc
resplender/XYLn
retinir/XYL
revestir/YPLM
rir/YL
roçar/XYPLD
sacar/XYPLD
sarilhar/XYPL
sentar/XYPL
sindicar/XYPLcD
sobrescrever/XYPL
sonorizar/XYPLc
subsecretariar/XYPL
superiorizar/XYPL
tamborilar/XYL
tentar/XYPLcMDn
tolher/XYPLM
tralhar/XYPL
transviar/XYPLD
triplicar/XYPLc
uniformizar/XYPLcD
varrer/XYPLDM
vestir/YL
vitoriar/XYPL
zonzear/ZYL
dealbar/LPXYlp
quilhar/LPXY
encarapelar/ZYL
draftar/XY
